Missouri, session 2026, HB1768.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 53.255, 137.016, 137.073, 137.115,
137.180, 137.355, 137.490, 137.1050, 139.031, 139.053, 140.010,
and 164.151, RSMo, are repealed and nineteen new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 53.255, 67.496,
115.240, 137.016, 137.067, 137.073, 137.115, 137.121, 137.180,
137.355, 137.490, 137.1050, 137.1060, 139.031, 139.053,
139.145, 140.010, 164.151, and 1, to read as follows:
53.255. 1. In addition to all other qualifications
imposed by law, it shall be a qualification of the office of
assessor that he or she shall, no earlier than [his]
becoming an assessor-elect and no later than the second
anniversary of the date of [his] commencing a term of
office, attend a course of study concerning the assessment
of ad valorem property taxes and thereafter be certified by
the commission. Assessors appointed to office on or before
January 1, 1981, shall attend such course of study within
two years of January 1, 1981, and thereafter be certified by
the commission.


2. Upon notice by the provider of the courses to the
commission that an assessor or assessor-elect has attended
such a course of study, the commission shall issue a
certificate of attendance to the assessor or assessor-elect.
3. The commission shall set, as a minimum for each
course of study, classroom time totaling thirty-two hours,
or for any new assessor or assessor-elect appointed to
office on or after January 1, 2027, a minimum of forty
hours, and any newly elected assessor shall be required to
complete a minimum of forty hours of training specifically
designed for newly elected assessors before assuming
office. The commission shall develop course listings which
meet the requirement of this subsection and have continuing
authority to modify and supplement such list.
4. To remain certified as provided in sections 53.250
to [53.265] 53.270, each assessor [must] shall, within each
two-year period after certification, attend at least one
additional course of study approved in the manner provided
in subsection 3 of this section.
5. Nothing contained in sections 53.250 to [53.265]
53.270 shall be construed to require that an assessor or
assessor-elect pass a written or oral examination upon the
subject matter of the ad valorem course of study, but in all
cases attendance at such course of study shall be sufficient
qualification for office and additional compensation within
the provisions of sections 53.250 to [53.265] 53.270.
[6. Upon written notice by the commission that an
assessor has failed to properly comply with the provisions
of sections 53.250 to 53.265, the state director of
revenue shall immediately suspend payments of assessment
costs by the state under sections 137.700 and 137.710 to the
county in which the assessor is serving until such time as
the assessor complies with sections 53.250 to 53.265,


resigns from office, is removed from office by appropriate
legal action, or until his successor in office is qualified,
whichever comes first. The withholding of state funding
under sections 137.700 and 137.710 shall not be construed to
be the exclusive remedy against an assessor who fails to
qualify for office under this section, but other remedies
provided by law shall be available.]
67.496. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, no political subdivision or election
authority shall through paid advertising advocate for any
proposed tax on property in a political subdivision as not
increasing taxes, or any language to that effect, unless
both:
(1) Failing to adopt the proposed measure would cause
an actual increase in the tax rate; and
(2) Adopting the proposed measure would cause the tax
rate to stay the same or decrease.
2. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a political
subdivision or election authority from expending resources
to provide factual information regarding a ballot measure.
115.240. The election authority for any political
subdivision or special district shall label ballot measures
relating to taxation that are submitted by such political
subdivision or special district to a vote of the people
numerically or alphabetically in the order in which they are
submitted. No such ballot measure shall be labeled in a
descriptive manner aside from its numerical or alphabetical
designation. Election authorities may coordinate with each
other, or with the secretary of state, to maintain a
database or other record and to ensure that the same measure
shared on the ballot of multiple election authorities at the
same election will have the same numerical or alphabetical
assignment.


137.016. 1. As used in Section 4(b) of Article X of
the Missouri Constitution, the following terms mean:
(1) "Residential property"[,]:
(a) All real property improved by a structure which is
used or intended to be used for residential living by human
occupants[,];
(b) Vacant land in connection with an airport[,];
(c) Land used as a golf course[,];
(d) Manufactured home parks[,];
(e) Bed and breakfast inns in which the owner resides
and uses as a primary residence with six or fewer rooms for
rent[, and];
(f) Time-share units as defined in section 407.600,
except to the extent such units are actually rented and
subject to sales tax under subdivision (6) of subsection 1
of section 144.020[, but]; and
(g) Any single family home owned by an individual or
business that is leased for a term of less than thirty
consecutive days, in whole or in part, subject to sales tax
under subdivision (6) of subsection 1 of section 144.020,
provided that the provisions of this paragraph may not apply
to such properties in excess of fifteen such properties
owned by the same individual or business. For the purposes
of this paragraph, the term "business" shall mean a sole
proprietor, partnership, or limited liability company. For
the purposes of this paragraph for determining the number of
single family homes leased for a term of less than thirty
consecutive days, in whole or in part, subject to sales tax
under subdivision (6) of subsection 1 of section 144.020
owned by an individual or business, all single family homes
that are such properties owned by the individual or
business, or owned by any business entity in which such
individual or business holds any ownership, membership, or


beneficial interest, direct or indirect, shall be counted.
The provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to
authorize the classification of any real property owned by a
corporation as residential property.
Residential property shall not include other similar
facilities used primarily for transient housing. For the
purposes of this section, "transient housing" means all
rooms available for rent or lease for which the receipts
from the rent or lease of such rooms are subject to state
sales tax pursuant to subdivision (6) of subsection 1 of
section 144.020; the leasing of a single family home, in
whole or in part, for a term of less than thirty consecutive
days does not, in itself, constitute "transient housing";
(2) "Agricultural and horticultural property", all
real property used for agricultural purposes and devoted
primarily to the raising and harvesting of crops; to the
feeding, breeding and management of livestock which shall
include breeding, showing, and boarding of horses; to
dairying, or to any other combination thereof; and buildings
and structures customarily associated with farming,
agricultural, and horticultural uses. Agricultural and
horticultural property shall also include land devoted to
and qualifying for payments or other compensation under a
soil conservation or agricultural assistance program under
an agreement with an agency of the federal government.
Agricultural and horticultural property shall further
include any reliever airport. Real property classified as
forest croplands shall not be agricultural or horticultural
property so long as it is classified as forest croplands and
shall be taxed in accordance with the laws enacted to
implement Section 7 of Article X of the Missouri
Constitution. Agricultural and horticultural property shall


also include any sawmill or planing mill defined in the U.S.
Department of Labor's Standard Industrial Classification
(SIC) Manual under Industry Group 242 with the SIC number
2421. Agricultural and horticultural property shall also
include urban and community gardens. For the purposes of
this section, "urban and community gardens" shall include
real property cultivated by residents of a neighborhood or
community for the purposes of providing agricultural
products, as defined in section 262.900, for the use of
residents of the neighborhood or community, and shall not
include a garden intended for individual or personal use;
(3) "Utility, industrial, commercial, railroad and
other real property", all real property used directly or
indirectly for any commercial, mining, industrial,
manufacturing, trade, professional, business, or similar
purpose, including all property centrally assessed by the
state tax commission but shall not include floating docks,
portions of which are separately owned and the remainder of
which is designated for common ownership and in which no one
person or business entity owns more than five individual
units. All other real property not included in the property
listed in subclasses (1) and (2) of Section 4(b) of Article
X of the Missouri Constitution, as such property is defined
in this section, shall be deemed to be included in the term
"utility, industrial, commercial, railroad and other real
property".
2. Pursuant to Article X of the state Constitution,
any taxing district may adjust its operating levy to recoup
any loss of property tax revenue, except revenues from the
surtax imposed pursuant to Article X, Subsection 2 of
Section 6 of the Constitution, as the result of changing the
classification of structures intended to be used for
residential living by human occupants which contain five or


more dwelling units if such adjustment of the levy does not
100 exceed the highest tax rate in effect subsequent to the 1980
101 tax year. For purposes of this section, loss in revenue
102 shall include the difference between the revenue that would
103 have been collected on such property under its
104 classification prior to enactment of this section and the
105 amount to be collected under its classification under this
106 section. The county assessor of each county or city not
107 within a county shall provide information to each taxing
108 district within its boundaries regarding the difference in
109 assessed valuation of such property as the result of such
110 change in classification.
111 3. All reclassification of property as the result of
112 changing the classification of structures intended to be
113 used for residential living by human occupants which contain
114 five or more dwelling units shall apply to assessments made
115 after December 31, 1994.
116 4. Where real property is used or held for use for
117 more than one purpose and such uses result in different
118 classifications, the county assessor shall allocate to each
119 classification the percentage of the true value in money of
120 the property devoted to each use; except that, where
121 agricultural and horticultural property, as defined in this
122 section, also contains a dwelling unit or units, the farm
123 dwelling, appurtenant residential-related structures and up
124 to five acres immediately surrounding such farm dwelling
125 shall be residential property, as defined in this section,
126 provided that the portion of property used or held for use
127 as an urban and community garden shall not be residential
128 property. This subsection shall not apply to any reliever
129 airport.
130 5. All real property which is vacant, unused, or held
131 for future use; which is used for a private club, a not-for-


132 profit or other nonexempt lodge, club, business, trade,
133 service organization, or similar entity; or for which a
134 determination as to its classification cannot be made under
135 the definitions set out in subsection 1 of this section,
136 shall be classified according to its immediate most suitable
137 economic use, which use shall be determined after
138 consideration of:
139 (1) Immediate prior use, if any, of such property;
140 (2) Location of such property;
141 (3) Zoning classification of such property; except
142 that, such zoning classification shall not be considered
143 conclusive if, upon consideration of all factors, it is
144 determined that such zoning classification does not reflect
145 the immediate most suitable economic use of the property;
146 (4) Other legal restrictions on the use of such
147 property;
148 (5) Availability of water, electricity, gas, sewers,
149 street lighting, and other public services for such property;
150 (6) Size of such property;
151 (7) Access of such property to public thoroughfares;
152 and
153 (8) Any other factors relevant to a determination of
154 the immediate most suitable economic use of such property.
155 6. All lands classified as forest croplands shall not,
156 for taxation purposes, be classified as subclass (1),
157 subclass (2), or subclass (3) real property, as such classes
158 are prescribed in Section 4(b) of Article X of the Missouri
159 Constitution and defined in this section, but shall be taxed
160 in accordance with the laws enacted to implement Section 7
161 of Article X of the Missouri Constitution.
162 7. An assessor shall not reclassify any real property
163 from one subclass of real property to another subclass of
164 real property without first providing written notice to the


165 owner of record of such property and offering an opportunity
166 for an in-person consultation with the owner of record.
137.067. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to
the contrary, any ballot measure seeking approval to add,
change, or modify a tax on residential real property shall
express the effect of the proposed change within the ballot
language in terms of the change in real dollars owed per one
hundred thousand dollars of a property's market valuation.
137.073. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "General reassessment", changes in value, entered
in the assessor's books, of a substantial portion of the
parcels of real property within a county resulting wholly or
partly from reappraisal of value or other actions of the
assessor or county equalization body or ordered by the state
tax commission or any court;
(2) "Tax rate", "rate", or "rate of levy", singular or
plural, includes the tax rate for each purpose of taxation
of property a taxing authority is authorized to levy without
a vote and any tax rate authorized by election, including
bond interest and sinking fund;
(3) "Tax rate ceiling", a tax rate as revised by the
taxing authority to comply with the provisions of this
section or when a court has determined the tax rate; except
that, other provisions of law to the contrary
notwithstanding, a school district may levy the operating
levy for school purposes required for the current year
pursuant to subsection 2 of section 163.021, less all
adjustments required pursuant to Article X, Section 22 of
the Missouri Constitution, if such tax rate does not exceed
the highest tax rate in effect subsequent to the 1980 tax
year. This is the maximum tax rate that may be levied,


unless a higher tax rate ceiling is approved by voters of
the political subdivision as provided in this section;
(4) "Tax revenue", when referring to the previous
year, means the actual receipts from ad valorem levies on
all classes of property, including state-assessed property,
in the immediately preceding fiscal year of the political
subdivision, plus an allowance for taxes billed but not
collected in the fiscal year and plus an additional
allowance for the revenue which would have been collected
from property which was annexed by such political
subdivision but which was not previously used in determining
tax revenue pursuant to this section. The term "tax
revenue" shall not include any receipts from ad valorem
levies on any property of a railroad corporation or a public
utility, as these terms are defined in section 386.020,
which were assessed by the assessor of a county or city in
the previous year but are assessed by the state tax
commission in the current year. All school districts and
those counties levying sales taxes pursuant to chapter 67
shall include in the calculation of tax revenue an amount
equivalent to that by which they reduced property tax levies
as a result of sales tax pursuant to section 67.505 and
section 164.013 [or as excess home dock city or county fees
as provided in subsection 4 of section 313.820] in the
immediately preceding fiscal year but not including any
amount calculated to adjust for prior years. For purposes
of political subdivisions which were authorized to levy a
tax in the prior year but which did not levy such tax or
levied a reduced rate, the term "tax revenue", as used in
relation to the revision of tax levies mandated by law,
shall mean the revenues equal to the amount that would have
been available if the voluntary rate reduction had not been
made.


2. (1) Whenever changes in assessed valuation are
entered in the assessor's books for any personal property,
in the aggregate, or for any subclass of real property as
such subclasses are established in Section 4(b) of Article X
of the Missouri Constitution and defined in section 137.016,
the county clerk in all counties and the assessor of St.
Louis City shall notify each political subdivision wholly or
partially within the county or St. Louis City of the change
in valuation of each subclass of real property,
individually, and personal property, in the aggregate,
exclusive of new construction and improvements. All
political subdivisions shall immediately revise the
applicable rates of levy for each purpose for each subclass
of real property, individually, and personal property, in
the aggregate, for which taxes are levied to the extent
necessary to produce from all taxable property, exclusive of
new construction and improvements, substantially the same
amount of tax revenue as was produced in the previous year
for each subclass of real property, individually, and
personal property, in the aggregate, except that the rate
shall not exceed the greater of the most recent voter-
approved rate or the most recent voter-approved rate as
adjusted under subdivision (2) of subsection 5 of this
section.
(2) Any political subdivision that has received
approval from voters for a tax increase after August 27,
2008, may levy a rate to collect substantially the same
amount of tax revenue as the amount of revenue that would
have been derived by applying the voter-approved increased
tax rate ceiling to the total assessed valuation of the
political subdivision as most recently certified by the city
or county clerk on or before the date of the election in
which such increase is approved, increased by the percentage


increase in the consumer price index, as provided by law,
except that the rate shall not exceed the greater of the
most recent voter-approved rate or the most recent voter-
approved rate as adjusted under subdivision (2) of
subsection 5 of this section. Such tax revenue shall not
include any receipts from ad valorem levies on any real
property which was assessed by the assessor of a county or
city in such previous year but is assessed by the assessor
of a county or city in the current year in a different
100 subclass of real property.
101 (3) Where the taxing authority is a school district
102 for the purposes of revising the applicable rates of levy
103 for each subclass of real property, the tax revenues from
104 state-assessed railroad and utility property shall be
105 apportioned and attributed to each subclass of real property
106 based on the percentage of the total assessed valuation of
107 the county that each subclass of real property represents in
108 the current [taxable] tax year.
109 (4) As provided in Section 22 of Article X of the
110 constitution, a political subdivision may also revise each
111 levy to allow for inflationary assessment growth occurring
112 within the political subdivision. The inflationary growth
113 factor for any such subclass of real property or personal
114 property shall be limited to the actual assessment growth in
115 such subclass or class, exclusive of new construction and
116 improvements, and exclusive of the assessed value on any
117 real property which was assessed by the assessor of a county
118 or city in the current year in a different subclass of real
119 property, but not to exceed the consumer price index or five
120 percent, whichever is lower. Should the tax revenue of a
121 political subdivision from the various tax rates determined
122 in this subsection be different than the tax revenue that
123 would have been determined from a single tax rate as


124 calculated pursuant to the method of calculation in this
125 subsection prior to January 1, 2003, then the political
126 subdivision shall revise the tax rates of those subclasses
127 of real property, individually, and/or personal property, in
128 the aggregate, in which there is a tax rate reduction,
129 pursuant to the provisions of this subsection. Such
130 revision shall yield an amount equal to such difference and
131 shall be apportioned among such subclasses of real property,
132 individually, and/or personal property, in the aggregate,
133 based on the relative assessed valuation of the class or
134 subclasses of property experiencing a tax rate reduction.
135 Such revision in the tax rates of each class or subclass
136 shall be made by computing the percentage of current year
137 adjusted assessed valuation of each class or subclass with a
138 tax rate reduction to the total current year adjusted
139 assessed valuation of the class or subclasses with a tax
140 rate reduction, multiplying the resulting percentages by the
141 revenue difference between the single rate calculation and
142 the calculations pursuant to this subsection and dividing by
143 the respective adjusted current year assessed valuation of
144 each class or subclass to determine the adjustment to the
145 rate to be levied upon each class or subclass of property.
146 The adjustment computed herein shall be multiplied by one
147 hundred, rounded to four decimals in the manner provided in
148 this subsection, and added to the initial rate computed for
149 each class or subclass of property. For school districts
150 that levy separate tax rates on each subclass of real
151 property and personal property in the aggregate, if voters
152 approved a ballot before January 1, 2011, that presented
153 separate stated tax rates to be applied to the different
154 subclasses of real property and personal property in the
155 aggregate, or increases the separate rates that may be
156 levied on the different subclasses of real property and


157 personal property in the aggregate by different amounts, the
158 tax rate that shall be used for the single tax rate
159 calculation shall be a blended rate, calculated in the
160 manner provided under subdivision (1) of subsection 6 of
161 this section.
162 (5) Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection
163 to the contrary, no revision to the rate of levy for
164 personal property shall cause such levy to increase over the
165 levy for personal property from the prior year.
166 3. (1) Where the taxing authority is a school
167 district, it shall be required to revise the rates of levy
168 to the extent necessary to produce from all taxable
169 property, including state-assessed railroad and utility
170 property, which shall be separately estimated in addition to
171 other data required in complying with section 164.011,
172 substantially the amount of tax revenue permitted in this
173 section. In the year following tax rate reduction, the tax
174 rate ceiling may be adjusted to offset such district's
175 reduction in the apportionment of state school moneys due to
176 its reduced tax rate. However, in the event any school
177 district, in calculating a tax rate ceiling pursuant to this
178 section, requiring the estimating of effects of state-
179 assessed railroad and utility valuation or loss of state
180 aid, discovers that the estimates used result in receipt of
181 excess revenues, which would have required a lower rate if
182 the actual information had been known, the school district
183 shall reduce the tax rate ceiling in the following year to
184 compensate for the excess receipts, and the recalculated
185 rate shall become the tax rate ceiling for purposes of this
186 section.
187 (2) For any political subdivision which experiences a
188 reduction in the amount of assessed valuation relating to a
189 prior year, due to decisions of the state tax commission or


190 a court pursuant to sections 138.430 to 138.433, or due to
191 clerical errors or corrections in the calculation or
192 recordation of any assessed valuation:
193 (a) Such political subdivision may revise the tax rate
194 ceiling for each purpose it levies taxes to compensate for
195 the reduction in assessed value occurring after the
196 political subdivision calculated the tax rate ceiling for
197 the particular subclass of real property or for personal
198 property, in the aggregate, in a prior year. Such revision
199 by the political subdivision shall be made at the time of
200 the next calculation of the tax rate for the particular
201 subclass of real property or for personal property, in the
202 aggregate, after the reduction in assessed valuation has
203 been determined and shall be calculated in a manner that
204 results in the revised tax rate ceiling being the same as it
205 would have been had the corrected or finalized assessment
206 been available at the time of the prior calculation;
207 (b) In addition, for up to three years following the
208 determination of the reduction in assessed valuation as a
209 result of circumstances defined in this subdivision, such
210 political subdivision may levy a tax rate for each purpose
211 it levies taxes above the revised tax rate ceiling provided
212 in paragraph (a) of this subdivision to recoup any revenues
213 it was entitled to receive had the corrected or finalized
214 assessment been available at the time of the prior
215 calculation.
216 4. (1) In order to implement the provisions of this
217 section and Section 22 of Article X of the Constitution of
218 Missouri, the term improvements shall apply to both real and
219 personal property. In order to determine the value of new
220 construction and improvements, each county assessor shall
221 maintain a record of real property valuations in such a
222 manner as to identify each year the increase in valuation


223 for each political subdivision in the county as a result of
224 new construction and improvements. The value of new
225 construction and improvements shall include the additional
226 assessed value of all improvements or additions to real
227 property which were begun after and were not part of the
228 prior year's assessment, except that the additional assessed
229 value of all improvements or additions to real property
230 which had been totally or partially exempt from ad valorem
231 taxes pursuant to sections 99.800 to 99.865, sections
232 135.200 to 135.255, and section 353.110 shall be included in
233 the value of new construction and improvements when the
234 property becomes totally or partially subject to assessment
235 and payment of all ad valorem taxes. The aggregate increase
236 in valuation of personal property for the current year over
237 that of the previous year is the equivalent of the new
238 construction and improvements factor for personal property.
239 Notwithstanding any opt-out implemented pursuant to
240 subsection 14 of section 137.115, the assessor shall certify
241 the amount of new construction and improvements and the
242 amount of assessed value on any real property which was
243 assessed by the assessor of a county or city in such
244 previous year but is assessed by the assessor of a county or
245 city in the current year in a different subclass of real
246 property separately for each of the three subclasses of real
247 property for each political subdivision to the county clerk
248 in order that political subdivisions shall have this
249 information for the purpose of calculating tax rates
250 pursuant to this section and Section 22, Article X,
251 Constitution of Missouri. In addition, the state tax
252 commission shall certify each year to each county clerk the
253 increase in the general price level as measured by the
254 Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for the United
255 States, or its successor publications, as defined and


256 officially reported by the United States Department of
257 Labor, or its successor agency. The state tax commission
258 shall certify the increase in such index on the latest
259 twelve-month basis available on February first of each year
260 over the immediately preceding prior twelve-month period in
261 order that political subdivisions shall have this
262 information available in setting their tax rates according
263 to law and Section 22 of Article X of the Constitution of
264 Missouri. For purposes of implementing the provisions of
265 this section and Section 22 of Article X of the Missouri
266 Constitution, the term "property" means all taxable
267 property, including state-assessed property.
268 (2) Each political subdivision required to revise
269 rates of levy pursuant to this section or Section 22 of
270 Article X of the Constitution of Missouri shall calculate
271 each tax rate it is authorized to levy and, in establishing
272 each tax rate, shall consider each provision for tax rate
273 revision provided in this section and Section 22 of Article
274 X of the Constitution of Missouri, separately and without
275 regard to annual tax rate reductions provided in section
276 67.505 and section 164.013. Each political subdivision
277 shall set each tax rate it is authorized to levy using the
278 calculation that produces the lowest tax rate ceiling. It
279 is further the intent of the general assembly, pursuant to
280 the authority of Section 10(c) of Article X of the
281 Constitution of Missouri, that the provisions of such
282 section be applicable to tax rate revisions mandated
283 pursuant to Section 22 of Article X of the Constitution of
284 Missouri as to reestablishing tax rates as revised in
285 subsequent years, enforcement provisions, and other
286 provisions not in conflict with Section 22 of Article X of
287 the Constitution of Missouri. Annual tax rate reductions
288 provided in section 67.505 and section 164.013 shall be


289 applied to the tax rate as established pursuant to this
290 section and Section 22 of Article X of the Constitution of
291 Missouri, unless otherwise provided by law.
292 5. (1) In all political subdivisions, the tax rate
293 ceiling established pursuant to this section shall not be
294 increased unless approved by a vote of the people. Approval
295 of the higher tax rate shall be by at least a majority of
296 votes cast. When a proposed higher tax rate requires
297 approval by more than a simple majority pursuant to any
298 provision of law or the constitution, the tax rate increase
299 must receive approval by at least the majority required.
300 (2) When voters approve an increase in the tax rate,
301 the amount of the increase shall be added to the tax rate
302 ceiling as calculated pursuant to this section to the extent
303 the total rate does not exceed any maximum rate prescribed
304 by law. If a ballot question presents a stated tax rate for
305 approval rather than describing the amount of increase in
306 the question, the stated tax rate approved shall be adjusted
307 as provided in this section and, so adjusted, shall be the
308 current tax rate ceiling. The increased tax rate ceiling as
309 approved shall be adjusted such that, when applied to the
310 current total assessed valuation of the political
311 subdivision, excluding new construction and improvements
312 since the date of the election approving such increase, the
313 revenue derived from the adjusted tax rate ceiling is equal
314 to the sum of: the amount of revenue which would have been
315 derived by applying the voter-approved increased tax rate
316 ceiling to total assessed valuation of the political
317 subdivision, as most recently certified by the city or
318 county clerk on or before the date of the election in which
319 such increase is approved, increased by the percentage
320 increase in the consumer price index, as provided by law.
321 Such adjusted tax rate ceiling may be applied to the total


322 assessed valuation of the political subdivision at the
323 setting of the next tax rate. If a ballot question presents
324 a phased-in tax rate increase, upon voter approval, each tax
325 rate increase shall be adjusted in the manner prescribed in
326 this section to yield the sum of: the amount of revenue
327 that would be derived by applying such voter-approved
328 increased rate to the total assessed valuation, as most
329 recently certified by the city or county clerk on or before
330 the date of the election in which such increase was
331 approved, increased by the percentage increase in the
332 consumer price index, as provided by law, from the date of
333 the election to the time of such increase and, so adjusted,
334 shall be the current tax rate ceiling.
335 (3) The provisions of subdivision (2) of this
336 subsection notwithstanding, if, prior to the expiration of a
337 temporary levy increase, voters approve a subsequent levy
338 increase, the new tax rate ceiling shall remain in effect
339 only until such time as the temporary levy expires under the
340 terms originally approved by a vote of the people, at which
341 time the tax rate ceiling shall be decreased by the amount
342 of the temporary levy increase. If, prior to the expiration
343 of a temporary levy increase, voters of a political
344 subdivision are asked to approve an additional, permanent
345 increase to the political subdivision's tax rate ceiling,
346 voters shall be submitted ballot language that clearly
347 indicates that if the permanent levy increase is approved,
348 the temporary levy shall be made permanent.
349 (4) The governing body of any political subdivision
350 may levy a tax rate lower than its tax rate ceiling and may,
351 in a nonreassessment year, increase that lowered tax rate to
352 a level not exceeding the tax rate ceiling without voter
353 approval in the manner provided under subdivision [(4)] (5)
354 of this subsection. Nothing in this section shall be


355 construed as prohibiting a political subdivision from
356 voluntarily levying a tax rate lower than that which is
357 required under the provisions of this section or from
358 seeking voter approval of a reduction to such political
359 subdivision's tax rate ceiling.
360 [(4)] (5) In a year of general reassessment, a
361 governing body whose tax rate is lower than its tax rate
362 ceiling shall revise its tax rate pursuant to the provisions
363 of subsection 4 of this section as if its tax rate was at
364 the tax rate ceiling. In a year following general
365 reassessment, if such governing body intends to increase its
366 tax rate, the governing body shall conduct a public hearing,
367 and in a public meeting it shall adopt an ordinance,
368 resolution, or policy statement justifying its action prior
369 to setting and certifying its tax rate. The provisions of
370 this subdivision shall not apply to any political
371 subdivision which levies a tax rate lower than its tax rate
372 ceiling solely due to a reduction required by law resulting
373 from sales tax collections. The provisions of this
374 subdivision shall not apply to any political subdivision
375 which has received voter approval for an increase to its tax
376 rate ceiling subsequent to setting its most recent tax rate.
377 (6) (a) As used in this subdivision, the following
378 terms mean:
379 a. "Current tax rate ceiling", the tax rate ceiling in
380 effect before the voters approve a higher tax rate;
381 b. "Increased tax rate ceiling", the new tax rate
382 ceiling in effect after the voters approve a higher tax rate.
383 (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
384 contrary, when the required majority of voters in a
385 political subdivision passes an increase in the political
386 subdivision's tax rate, the political subdivision shall use
387 the current tax rate ceiling and the increase approved by


388 the voters in establishing the rates of levy for the tax
389 year immediately following the election.
390 (c) If the assessed valuation of real property in such
391 political subdivision is reduced in such tax year
392 immediately following the election, such political
393 subdivision may raise its rates of levy so that the revenue
394 received from its local real property tax rates equals the
395 amount the political subdivision would have received from
396 the increased rates of levy had there been no reduction in
397 the assessed valuation of real property in the political
398 subdivision.
399 6. (1) For the purposes of calculating state aid for
400 public schools pursuant to section 163.031, each taxing
401 authority which is a school district shall determine its
402 proposed tax rate as a blended rate of the classes or
403 subclasses of property. Such blended rate shall be
404 calculated by first determining the total tax revenue of the
405 property within the jurisdiction of the taxing authority,
406 which amount shall be equal to the sum of the products of
407 multiplying the assessed valuation of each class and
408 subclass of property by the corresponding tax rate for such
409 class or subclass, then dividing the total tax revenue by
410 the total assessed valuation of the same jurisdiction, and
411 then multiplying the resulting quotient by a factor of one
412 hundred. Where the taxing authority is a school district,
413 such blended rate shall also be used by such school district
414 for calculating revenue from state-assessed railroad and
415 utility property as defined in chapter 151 and for
416 apportioning the tax rate by purpose.
417 (2) Each taxing authority proposing to levy a tax rate
418 in any year shall notify the clerk of the county commission
419 in the county or counties where the tax rate applies of its
420 tax rate ceiling and its proposed tax rate. Each taxing


421 authority shall express its proposed tax rate in a fraction
422 equal to the nearest one-tenth of a cent, unless its
423 proposed tax rate is in excess of one dollar, then one/one-
424 hundredth of a cent. If a taxing authority shall round to
425 one/one-hundredth of a cent, it shall round up a fraction
426 greater than or equal to five/one-thousandth of one cent to
427 the next higher one/one-hundredth of a cent; if a taxing
428 authority shall round to one-tenth of a cent, it shall round
429 up a fraction greater than or equal to five/one-hundredths
430 of a cent to the next higher one-tenth of a cent. Any
431 taxing authority levying a property tax rate shall provide
432 data, in such form as shall be prescribed by the state
433 auditor by rule, substantiating such tax rate complies with
434 Missouri law. All forms for the calculation of rates
435 pursuant to this section shall be promulgated as a rule and
436 shall not be incorporated by reference. The state auditor
437 shall promulgate rules for any and all forms for the
438 calculation of rates pursuant to this section which do not
439 currently exist in rule form or that have been incorporated
440 by reference. In addition, each taxing authority proposing
441 to levy a tax rate for debt service shall provide data, in
442 such form as shall be prescribed by the state auditor by
443 rule, substantiating the tax rate for debt service complies
444 with Missouri law. A tax rate proposed for annual debt
445 service requirements will be prima facie valid if, after
446 making the payment for which the tax was levied, bonds
447 remain outstanding and the debt fund reserves do not exceed
448 the following year's payments. The county clerk shall keep
449 on file and available for public inspection all such
450 information for a period of three years. The clerk shall,
451 within three days of receipt, forward a copy of the notice
452 of a taxing authority's tax rate ceiling and proposed tax
453 rate and any substantiating data to the state auditor. The


454 state auditor shall, within fifteen days of the date of
455 receipt, examine such information and return to the county
456 clerk his or her findings as to compliance of the tax rate
457 ceiling with this section and as to compliance of any
458 proposed tax rate for debt service with Missouri law. If
459 the state auditor believes that a taxing authority's
460 proposed tax rate does not comply with Missouri law, then
461 the state auditor's findings shall include a recalculated
462 tax rate, and the state auditor may request a taxing
463 authority to submit documentation supporting such taxing
464 authority's proposed tax rate. The county clerk shall
465 immediately forward a copy of the auditor's findings to the
466 taxing authority and shall file a copy of the findings with
467 the information received from the taxing authority. The
468 taxing authority shall have fifteen days from the date of
469 receipt from the county clerk of the state auditor's
470 findings and any request for supporting documentation to
471 accept or reject in writing the rate change certified by the
472 state auditor and to submit all requested information to the
473 state auditor. A copy of the taxing authority's acceptance
474 or rejection and any information submitted to the state
475 auditor shall also be mailed to the county clerk. If a
476 taxing authority rejects a rate change certified by the
477 state auditor and the state auditor does not receive
478 supporting information which justifies the taxing
479 authority's original or any subsequent proposed tax rate,
480 then the state auditor shall refer the perceived violations
481 of such taxing authority to the attorney general's office
482 and the attorney general is authorized to obtain injunctive
483 relief to prevent the taxing authority from levying a
484 violative tax rate.
485 (3) In addition to any reporting requirements provided
486 in subdivision (2) of this subsection, for any taxing


487 authority imposing a tax rate for debt service, in any year
488 in which such taxing authority is required to reduce its
489 rates of levy pursuant to this section or Section 22 of
490 Article X of the Constitution of Missouri, the taxing
491 authority shall separately report to the state auditor, on a
492 form to be provided by the auditor, any increase in the rate
493 of levy for debt service made during that same year. The
494 state auditor shall provide such data aggregated by taxing
495 authority in an easily accessible format on the state
496 auditor's website, and the state auditor may perform an
497 audit on any such taxing authority to ensure compliance with
498 the provisions of this section and Article X of the
499 Constitution of Missouri.
500 [(3)] (4) In the event that the taxing authority
501 incorrectly completes the forms created and promulgated
502 under subdivision (2) of this subsection, or makes a
503 clerical error, the taxing authority may submit amended
504 forms with an explanation for the needed changes. If such
505 amended forms are filed under regulations prescribed by the
506 state auditor, the state auditor shall take into
507 consideration such amended forms for the purposes of this
508 subsection.
509 7. No tax rate shall be extended on the tax rolls by
510 the county clerk unless the political subdivision has
511 complied with the foregoing provisions of this section.
512 8. Whenever a taxpayer has cause to believe that a
513 taxing authority has not complied with the provisions of
514 this section, the taxpayer may make a formal complaint with
515 the prosecuting attorney of the county. Where the
516 prosecuting attorney fails to bring an action within ten
517 days of the filing of the complaint, the taxpayer may bring
518 a civil action pursuant to this section and institute an
519 action as representative of a class of all taxpayers within


520 a taxing authority if the class is so numerous that joinder
521 of all members is impracticable, if there are questions of
522 law or fact common to the class, if the claims or defenses
523 of the representative parties are typical of the claims or
524 defenses of the class, and if the representative parties
525 will fairly and adequately protect the interests of the
526 class. In any class action maintained pursuant to this
527 section, the court may direct to the members of the class a
528 notice to be published at least once each week for four
529 consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation
530 published in the county where the civil action is commenced
531 and in other counties within the jurisdiction of a taxing
532 authority. The notice shall advise each member that the
533 court will exclude him or her from the class if he or she so
534 requests by a specified date, that the judgment, whether
535 favorable or not, will include all members who do not
536 request exclusion, and that any member who does not request
537 exclusion may, if he or she desires, enter an appearance.
538 In any class action brought pursuant to this section, the
539 court, in addition to the relief requested, shall assess
540 against the taxing authority found to be in violation of
541 this section the reasonable costs of bringing the action,
542 including reasonable attorney's fees, provided no attorney's
543 fees shall be awarded any attorney or association of
544 attorneys who receive public funds from any source for their
545 services. Any action brought pursuant to this section shall
546 be set for hearing as soon as practicable after the cause is
547 at issue.
548 9. If in any action, including a class action, the
549 court issues an order requiring a taxing authority to revise
550 the tax rates as provided in this section or enjoins a
551 taxing authority from the collection of a tax because of its
552 failure to revise the rate of levy as provided in this


553 section, any taxpayer paying his or her taxes when an
554 improper rate is applied has erroneously paid his or her
555 taxes in part, whether or not the taxes are paid under
556 protest as provided in section 139.031 or otherwise
557 contested. The part of the taxes paid erroneously is the
558 difference in the amount produced by the original levy and
559 the amount produced by the revised levy. The township or
560 county collector of taxes or the collector of taxes in any
561 city shall refund the amount of the tax erroneously paid.
562 The taxing authority refusing to revise the rate of levy as
563 provided in this section shall make available to the
564 collector all funds necessary to make refunds pursuant to
565 this subsection. No taxpayer shall receive any interest on
566 any money erroneously paid by him or her pursuant to this
567 subsection. Effective in the 1994 tax year, nothing in this
568 section shall be construed to require a taxing authority to
569 refund any tax erroneously paid prior to or during the third
570 tax year preceding the current tax year.
571 10. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
572 defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
573 authority delegated in this section shall become effective
574 only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
575 provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
576 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
577 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
578 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
579 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
580 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
581 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
582 2004, shall be invalid and void.
137.115. 1. (1) All other laws to the contrary
notwithstanding, the assessor or the assessor's deputies in
all counties of this state including the City of St. Louis


shall annually make a list of all real and tangible personal
property taxable in the assessor's city, county, town or
district.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 of
this section and section 137.078, the assessor shall
annually assess all personal property at thirty-three and
one-third percent of its true value in money as of January
first of each calendar year.
(3) The assessor shall annually assess all real
property, including any new construction and improvements to
real property, and possessory interests in real property at
the percent of its true value in money set in subsection 5
of this section. The true value in money of any possessory
interest in real property in subclass (3), where such real
property is on or lies within the ultimate airport boundary
as shown by a federal airport layout plan, as defined by 14
CFR 151.5, of a commercial airport having a FAR Part 139
certification and owned by a political subdivision, shall be
the otherwise applicable true value in money of any such
possessory interest in real property, less the total dollar
amount of costs paid by a party, other than the political
subdivision, towards any new construction or improvements on
such real property completed after January 1, 2008, and
which are included in the above-mentioned possessory
interest, regardless of the year in which such costs were
incurred or whether such costs were considered in any prior
year. The assessor shall annually assess all real property
in the following manner: new assessed values shall be
determined as of January first of each odd-numbered year and
shall be entered in the assessor's books; those same
assessed values shall apply in the following even-numbered
year, except for new construction and property improvements
which shall be valued as though they had been completed as


of January first of the preceding odd-numbered year. The
assessor may call at the office, place of doing business, or
residence of each person required by this chapter to list
property, and require the person to make a correct statement
of all taxable tangible personal property owned by the
person or under his or her care, charge or management,
taxable in the county.
(4) On or before January first of each even-numbered
year, the assessor shall prepare and submit a two-year
assessment maintenance plan to the county governing body and
the state tax commission for their respective approval or
modification. The county governing body shall approve and
forward such plan or its alternative to the plan to the
state tax commission by February first. If the county
governing body fails to forward the plan or its alternative
to the plan to the state tax commission by February first,
the assessor's plan shall be considered approved by the
county governing body. If the state tax commission fails to
approve a plan and if the state tax commission and the
assessor and the governing body of the county involved are
unable to resolve the differences, in order to receive state
cost-share funds outlined in section 137.750, the county or
the assessor shall petition the administrative hearing
commission, by May first, to decide all matters in dispute
regarding the assessment maintenance plan. Upon agreement
of the parties, the matter may be stayed while the parties
proceed with mediation or arbitration upon terms agreed to
by the parties. The final decision of the administrative
hearing commission shall be subject to judicial review in
the circuit court of the county involved.
(5) In the event a valuation of subclass (1) real
property or subclass (3) real property within any county
with a charter form of government, or within a city not


within a county, is made by a computer, computer-assisted
method or a computer program, the burden of proof, supported
by clear, convincing and cogent evidence to sustain such
valuation, shall be on the assessor at any hearing or
appeal. In any such county, unless the assessor proves
otherwise, there shall be a presumption that the assessment
was made by a computer, computer-assisted method or a
computer program. Such evidence shall include, but shall
not be limited to, the following, to the extent available:
[(1)] (a) The findings of the assessor based on an
appraisal of the property by generally accepted appraisal
techniques; and
[(2)] (b) The purchase prices from sales of at least
three comparable properties and the address or location
thereof. As used in this subdivision, the word "comparable"
means that:
[(a)] a. Such sale was closed at a date relevant to
the property valuation; and
[(b)] b. Such properties are not more than one mile
from the site of the disputed property, except where no
similar properties exist within one mile of the disputed
property, the nearest comparable property shall be used.
Such property shall be within five hundred square feet in
size of the disputed property, and resemble the disputed
property in age, floor plan, number of rooms, and other
relevant characteristics.
2. Assessors in each county of this state and the City
of St. Louis may send personal property assessment forms
through the mail.
3. The following items of personal property shall each
100 constitute separate subclasses of tangible personal property
101 and shall be assessed and valued for the purposes of


102 taxation at the following percentages of their true value in
103 money:
104 (1) Grain and other agricultural crops in an
105 unmanufactured condition, one-half of one percent;
106 (2) Livestock, twelve percent;
107 (3) Farm machinery, twelve percent;
108 (4) Motor vehicles which are eligible for registration
109 as and are registered as historic motor vehicles pursuant to
110 section 301.131 and aircraft which are at least twenty-five
111 years old and which are used solely for noncommercial
112 purposes and are operated less than two hundred hours per
113 year or aircraft that are home built from a kit, five
114 percent;
115 (5) Poultry, twelve percent;
116 (6) Tools and equipment used for pollution control and
117 tools and equipment used in retooling for the purpose of
118 introducing new product lines or used for making
119 improvements to existing products by any company which is
120 located in a state enterprise zone and which is identified
121 by any standard industrial classification number cited in
122 subdivision (7) of section 135.200, twenty-five percent; and
123 (7) Solar panels, racking systems, inverters, and
124 related solar equipment, components, materials, and supplies
125 installed in connection with solar photovoltaic energy
126 systems, as described in subdivision (46) of subsection 2 of
127 section 144.030, that were constructed and producing solar
128 energy prior to August 9, 2022, five percent.
129 4. The person listing the property shall enter a true
130 and correct statement of the property, in a printed blank
131 prepared for that purpose. The statement, after being
132 filled out, shall be signed and either affirmed or sworn to
133 as provided in section 137.155. The list shall then be
134 delivered to the assessor.


135 5. (1) All subclasses of real property, as such
136 subclasses are established in Section 4(b) of Article X of
137 the Missouri Constitution and defined in section 137.016,
138 shall be assessed at the following percentages of true value:
139 (a) For real property in subclass (1), nineteen
140 percent;
141 (b) For real property in subclass (2), twelve percent;
142 and
143 (c) For real property in subclass (3), thirty-two
144 percent.
145 (2) A taxpayer may apply to the county assessor, or,
146 if not located within a county, then the assessor of such
147 city, for the reclassification of such taxpayer's real
148 property if the use or purpose of such real property is
149 changed after such property is assessed under the provisions
150 of this chapter. If the assessor determines that such
151 property shall be reclassified, he or she shall determine
152 the assessment under this subsection based on the percentage
153 of the tax year that such property was classified in each
154 subclassification.
155 6. Manufactured homes, as defined in section 700.010,
156 which are actually used as dwelling units shall be assessed
157 at the same percentage of true value as residential real
158 property for the purpose of taxation. The percentage of
159 assessment of true value for such manufactured homes shall
160 be the same as for residential real property. If the county
161 collector cannot identify or find the manufactured home when
162 attempting to attach the manufactured home for payment of
163 taxes owed by the manufactured home owner, the county
164 collector may request the county commission to have the
165 manufactured home removed from the tax books, and such
166 request shall be granted within thirty days after the
167 request is made; however, the removal from the tax books


168 does not remove the tax lien on the manufactured home if it
169 is later identified or found. For purposes of this section,
170 a manufactured home located in a manufactured home rental
171 park, rental community or on real estate not owned by the
172 manufactured home owner shall be considered personal
173 property. For purposes of this section, a manufactured home
174 located on real estate owned by the manufactured home owner
175 may be considered real property.
176 7. Each manufactured home assessed shall be considered
177 a parcel for the purpose of reimbursement pursuant to
178 section 137.750, unless the manufactured home is deemed to
179 be real estate as defined in subsection 7 of section 442.015
180 and assessed as a realty improvement to the existing real
181 estate parcel.
182 8. Any amount of tax due and owing based on the
183 assessment of a manufactured home shall be included on the
184 personal property tax statement of the manufactured home
185 owner unless the manufactured home is deemed to be real
186 estate as defined in subsection 7 of section 442.015, in
187 which case the amount of tax due and owing on the assessment
188 of the manufactured home as a realty improvement to the
189 existing real estate parcel shall be included on the real
190 property tax statement of the real estate owner.
191 9. The assessor of each county and each city not
192 within a county shall use a nationally recognized automotive
193 trade publication such as the National Automobile Dealers'
194 Association Official Used Car Guide, Kelley Blue Book,
195 Edmunds, or other similar publication as the recommended
196 guide of information for determining the true value of motor
197 vehicles described in such publication. The state tax
198 commission shall select and make available to all assessors
199 which publication shall be used. The assessor of each
200 county and each city not within a county shall use the trade-


201 in value published in the current October issue of the
202 publication selected by the state tax commission. The
203 assessor shall not use a value that is greater than the
204 average trade-in value in determining the true value of the
205 motor vehicle without performing a physical inspection of
206 the motor vehicle. For vehicles two years old or newer from
207 a vehicle's model year, the assessor may use a value other
208 than average without performing a physical inspection of the
209 motor vehicle. In the absence of a listing for a particular
210 motor vehicle in such publication, the assessor shall use
211 such information or publications that, in the assessor's
212 judgment, will fairly estimate the true value in money of
213 the motor vehicle. For motor vehicles with a true value of
214 less than fifty thousand dollars as of January 1, 2025, the
215 assessor shall not assess such motor vehicle for an amount
216 greater than such motor vehicle was assessed in the previous
217 year, provided that such motor vehicle was properly assessed
218 in the previous year.
219 10. (1) Before the assessor may increase the assessed
220 valuation of any parcel of subclass (1) real property by
221 more than fifteen percent since the last assessment,
222 excluding increases due to new construction or improvements,
223 the assessor shall conduct a physical inspection of such
224 property.
225 (2) The property owner of any parcel of subclass (3)
226 real property may request the assessor to conduct a physical
227 inspection of such property if the assessed valuation of
228 such property has increased by more than fifteen percent
229 since the last assessment, excluding increases due to new
230 construction or improvements. Such physical inspection
231 shall comply with the provisions of subsection 12 of this
232 section.


233 11. If a physical inspection is required[,] pursuant
234 to subdivision (1) of subsection 10 of this section, the
235 assessor shall notify the property owner of that fact in
236 writing and shall provide the owner clear written notice of
237 the owner's rights relating to the physical inspection. If
238 a physical inspection is required, the property owner may
239 request that an interior inspection be performed during the
240 physical inspection. The owner shall have no less than
241 thirty days to notify the assessor of a request for an
242 interior physical inspection.
243 12. A physical inspection[, as required by subsection
244 10 of this section,] conducted pursuant to subsection 10 of
245 this section shall include, but not be limited to, an on-
246 site personal observation and review of all exterior
247 portions of the land and any buildings and improvements to
248 which the inspector has or may reasonably and lawfully gain
249 external access, and shall include an observation and review
250 of the interior of any buildings or improvements on the
251 property upon the timely request of the owner pursuant to
252 subsection 11 of this section. Mere observation of the
253 property via a drive-by inspection or the like shall not be
254 considered sufficient to constitute a physical inspection as
255 required by this section.
256 13. A county or city collector may accept credit cards
257 as proper form of payment of outstanding property tax or
258 license due. No county or city collector may charge
259 surcharge for payment by credit card which exceeds the fee
260 or surcharge charged by the credit card bank, processor, or
261 issuer for its service. A county or city collector may
262 accept payment by electronic transfers of funds in payment
263 of any tax or license and charge the person making such
264 payment a fee equal to the fee charged the county by the
265 bank, processor, or issuer of such electronic payment.


266 14. Any county or city not within a county in this
267 state may, by an affirmative vote of the governing body of
268 such county, opt out of the provisions of this section and
269 sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as enacted by house
270 bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general assembly, second
271 regular session and section 137.073 as modified by house
272 committee substitute for senate substitute for senate
273 committee substitute for senate bill no. 960, ninety-second
274 general assembly, second regular session, for the next year
275 of the general reassessment, prior to January first of any
276 year. No county or city not within a county shall exercise
277 this opt-out provision after implementing the provisions of
278 this section and sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as
279 enacted by house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general
280 assembly, second regular session and section 137.073 as
281 modified by house committee substitute for senate substitute
282 for senate committee substitute for senate bill no. 960,
283 ninety-second general assembly, second regular session, in a
284 year of general reassessment. For the purposes of applying
285 the provisions of this subsection , a political subdivision
286 contained within two or more counties where at least one of
287 such counties has opted out and at least one of such
288 counties has not opted out shall calculate a single tax rate
289 as in effect prior to the enactment of house bill no. 1150
290 of the ninety-first general assembly, second regular
291 session. A governing body of a city not within a county or
292 a county that has opted out under the provisions of this
293 subsection may choose to implement the provisions of this
294 section and sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as
295 enacted by house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general
296 assembly, second regular session, and section 137.073 as
297 modified by house committee substitute for senate substitute
298 for senate committee substitute for senate bill no. 960,


299 ninety-second general assembly, second regular session, for
300 the next year of general reassessment, by an affirmative
301 vote of the governing body prior to December thirty-first of
302 any year.
303 15. The governing body of any city of the third
304 classification with more than twenty-six thousand three
305 hundred but fewer than twenty-six thousand seven hundred
306 inhabitants located in any county that has exercised its
307 authority to opt out under subsection 14 of this section may
308 levy separate and differing tax rates for real and personal
309 property only if such city bills and collects its own
310 property taxes or satisfies the entire cost of the billing
311 and collection of such separate and differing tax rates.
312 Such separate and differing rates shall not exceed such
313 city's tax rate ceiling.
314 16. Any portion of real property that is available as
315 reserve for strip, surface, or coal mining for minerals for
316 purposes of excavation for future use or sale to others that
317 has not been bonded and permitted under chapter 444 shall be
318 assessed based upon how the real property is currently being
319 used. Any information provided to a county assessor, state
320 tax commission, state agency, or political subdivision
321 responsible for the administration of tax policies shall, in
322 the performance of its duties, make available all books,
323 records, and information requested, except such books,
324 records, and information as are by law declared confidential
325 in nature, including individually identifiable information
326 regarding a specific taxpayer or taxpayer's mine property.
327 For purposes of this subsection, "mine property" shall mean
328 all real property that is in use or readily available as a
329 reserve for strip, surface, or coal mining for minerals for
330 purposes of excavation for current or future use or sale to
331 others that has been bonded and permitted under chapter 444.


137.121. 1. Assessors may create, maintain, and store
assessment records, property characteristics, valuation
data, and supporting documentation in electronic format, and
such electronic records shall be deemed official records for
all purposes under Missouri law.
2. Assessors may establish an electronic notification
and record delivery system for assessment-related documents
and notices.
3. Property owners may voluntarily opt in to receive
assessment sheets, notices of change, and other official
communications by electronic means, including email or
secure electronic delivery.
4. Electronic notice and electronic record delivery
adopted under the provisions of this section shall have the
same legal effect as delivery by mail and shall satisfy all
statutory notice requirements.
137.180. 1. Whenever any assessor shall increase the
valuation of any real property he or she shall forthwith
notify the record owner of such increase, [either] in
person, [or] by first-class mail directed to the last known
address[;], or by electronic means, including email or
secure electronic delivery, provided the property owner has
consented to electronic delivery or has supplied an email
address to the assessor's office. Electronic notice
delivered in compliance with this subsection shall satisfy
all statutory notice requirements. Every such increase in
assessed valuation made by the assessor shall be subject to
review by the county board of equalization whereat the
landowner shall be entitled to be heard, and the notice to
the landowner shall so state.
2. Effective January 1, 2009, for all counties with a
charter form of government, other than any county adopting a
charter form of government after January 1, 2008, whenever


any assessor shall increase the valuation of any real
property, he or she shall forthwith notify the record owner
on or before June [fifteenth] first of such increase and, in
a year of general reassessment, the county shall notify the
record owner of the projected tax liability likely to result
from such an increase, [either] in person, [or] by first-
class mail directed to the last known address, or by
electronic means under the provisions of subsection 1 of
this section; every such increase in assessed valuation made
by the assessor shall be subject to review by the county
board of equalization whereat the landowner shall be
entitled to be heard, and the notice to the landowner shall
so state. Notice of the projected tax liability from the
county shall accompany the notice of increased valuation
from the assessor.
3. For all calendar years prior to the first day of
January of the year following receipt of software necessary
for the implementation of the requirements provided under
subsections 4 and 5 of this section from the state tax
commission, for any county not subject to the provisions of
subsection 2 of this section or subsection 2 of section
137.355, whenever any assessor shall increase the valuation
of any real property, he or she shall forthwith notify the
record owner on or before June [fifteenth] first of the
previous assessed value and such increase [either] in
person, [or] by first-class mail directed to the last known
address, or by electronic means under the provisions of
subsection 1 of this section, and include in such notice a
statement indicating that the change in assessed value may
impact the record owner's tax liability and provide all
processes and deadlines for appealing determinations of the
assessed value of such property. Such notice shall be
provided in a font and format sufficient to alert a record


owner of the potential impact upon tax liability and the
appellate processes available.
4. Effective January first of the year following
receipt of software necessary for the implementation of the
requirements provided under this subsection and subsection 5
of this section from the state tax commission, for all
counties not subject to the provisions of subsection 2 of
this section or subsection 2 of section 137.355, whenever
any assessor shall increase the valuation of any real
property, he or she shall forthwith notify the record owner
on or before June [fifteenth] first of such increase and, in
a year of general reassessment, the county shall notify the
record owner of the projected tax liability likely to result
from such an increase, [either] in person, [or] by first-
class mail directed to the last known address, or by
electronic means under the provisions of subsection 1 of
this section; every such increase in assessed valuation made
by the assessor shall be subject to review by the county
board of equalization whereat the landowner shall be
entitled to be heard, and the notice to the landowner shall
so state. Notice of the projected tax liability from the
county shall accompany the notice of increased valuation
from the assessor.
5. The notice of projected tax liability, required
under subsections 2 and 4 of this section, from the county
shall include:
(1) The record owner's name, address, and the parcel
number of the property;
(2) A list of all political subdivisions levying a tax
upon the property of the record owner;
(3) The projected tax rate for each political
subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the record


owner, and the purpose for each levy of such political
subdivisions;
(4) The previous year's tax rates for each individual
tax levy imposed by each political subdivision levying a tax
upon the property of the record owner;
(5) The tax rate ceiling for each levy imposed by each
political subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the
record owner;
(6) The contact information for each political
subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the record
owner;
(7) A statement identifying any projected tax rates
for political subdivisions levying a tax upon the property
of the record owner, which were not calculated and provided
by the political subdivision levying the tax; and
(8) The total projected property tax liability of the
taxpayer.
100 6. In addition to the requirements provided under
101 subsections 1, 2, and 5 of this section, effective January
102 1, 2011, in any county with a charter form of government and
103 with more than one million inhabitants, whenever any
104 assessor shall notify a record owner of any change in
105 assessed value, such assessor shall provide notice that
106 information regarding the assessment method and computation
107 of value for such property is available on the assessor's
108 website and provide the exact website address at which such
109 information may be accessed. Such notification shall
110 provide the assessor's contact information to enable
111 taxpayers without internet access to request and receive
112 information regarding the assessment method and computation
113 of value for such property.
114 7. Assessors may provide assessment sheets, valuation
115 notices, and other official communications electronically


116 upon obtaining consent from the property owner. No property
117 owner shall be required to receive electronic notices, and
118 paper notice shall be provided upon request.
137.355. 1. If an assessor increases the valuation of
any tangible personal property as estimated in the itemized
list furnished to the assessor, and if an assessor increases
the valuation of any real property, he or she shall
forthwith notify the record owner of the increase [either]
in person [or], by first-class mail directed to the last
known address, [and] or by electronic means, including email
or secure electronic delivery, provided the property owner
has consented to electronic delivery or has supplied an
email address to the assessor's office. Electronic notice
delivered in compliance with this subsection shall satisfy
all statutory notice requirements. If the address of the
owner is unknown notice shall be given by publication in two
newspapers published in the county.
2. For all calendar years prior to the first day of
January of the year following receipt of software necessary
for the implementation of the requirements provided under
subsections 3 and 4 of this section from the state tax
commission, whenever any assessor shall increase the
valuation of any real property, he or she shall forthwith
notify the record owner on or before June [fifteenth] first
of the previous assessed value and such increase [either] in
person, [or] by first-class mail directed to the last known
address, or by electronic means under the provisions of
subsection 1 of this section, and include on the face of
such notice, in no less than twelve-point font, the
following statement:
NOTICE TO TAXPAYER: IF YOUR ASSESSED VALUE
HAS INCREASED, IT MAY INCREASE YOUR REAL
PROPERTY TAXES WHICH ARE DUE DECEMBER THIRTY-


FIRST. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE THAT THE VALUE OF
YOUR PROPERTY HAS INCREASED, YOU MUST CHALLENGE
THE VALUE ON OR BEFORE ______ (INSERT DATE BY
WHICH APPEAL MUST BE FILED) BY CONTACTING YOUR
COUNTY ASSESSOR.
3. Effective January first of the year following
receipt of software necessary for the implementation of the
requirements provided under this subsection and subsection 4
of this section from the state tax commission, if an
assessor increases the valuation of any real property, the
assessor, on or before June [fifteenth] first, shall notify
the record owner of the increase and, in a year of general
reassessment, the county shall notify the record owner of
the projected tax liability likely to result from such an
increase [either] in person [or], by first-class mail
directed to the last known address, or by electronic means
under the provisions of subsection 1 of this section, and,
if the address of the owner is unknown, notice shall be
given by publication in two newspapers published in the
county. Notice of the projected tax liability from the
county shall accompany the notice of increased valuation
from the assessor.
4. The notice of projected tax liability, required
under subsection 3 of this section, from the county shall
include:
(1) The record owner's name, address, and the parcel
number of the property;
(2) A list of all political subdivisions levying a tax
upon the property of the record owner;
(3) The projected tax rate for each political
subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the record
owner, and the purpose for each levy of such political
subdivisions;


(4) The previous year's tax rates for each individual
tax levy imposed by each political subdivision levying a tax
upon the property of the record owner;
(5) The tax rate ceiling for each levy imposed by each
political subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the
record owner;
(6) The contact information for each political
subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the record
owner;
(7) A statement identifying any projected tax rates
for political subdivisions levying a tax upon the property
of the record owner, which were not calculated and provided
by the political subdivision levying the tax; and
(8) The total projected property tax liability of the
taxpayer.
5. Assessors may provide assessment sheets, valuation
notices, and other official communications electronically
upon obtaining consent from the property owner. No property
owner shall be required to receive electronic notices, and
paper notice shall be provided upon request.
137.490. 1. The assessor, or his deputies under his
direction, shall assess all the taxable real property within
the city and all tangible personal property taxable by the
city under the laws of this state in the manner provided in
sections 137.485 to 137.550 and as otherwise provided by
law, and for that purpose the assessor may divide and assign
the work or any of it among them. They shall commence their
assessment on the first day of January in each year and
complete the assessment, and the deputies make their final
reports thereof to the assessor, on or before the first day
of July next following. The assessor shall see that the
assessment is made uniform and equal throughout the city.
If the assessor proposes to increase any assessment of real


property, he or she shall give notice of the fact to the
person owning the property affected, his or her agent or
representative, by personal notice, [or] by first-class mail
directed to the last known address, or by electronic means,
including email or secure electronic delivery, provided the
property owner has consented to electronic delivery or has
supplied an email address to the assessor's office.
Electronic notice delivered in compliance with this
subsection shall satisfy all statutory notice requirements.
2. Effective January 1, 2009, the assessor, or his or
her deputies under his or her direction, shall commence
their assessment on the first day of January in each year
and complete the assessment, and the deputies make their
final reports thereof to the assessor, on or before the
first day of March next following. The assessor shall see
that the assessment is made uniform and equal throughout the
city. If the assessor proposes to increase any assessment
of real property, the assessor shall, on or before the
[fifteenth] first day of June, give notice of the fact and,
in a year of general reassessment, the city shall provide
notice of the projected tax liability likely to result from
such an increase to the person owning the property affected,
his or her agent or representative, by personal notice, [or]
by first-class mail directed to the last known address, or
by electronic means under the provisions of subsection 1 of
this section. Notice of the projected tax liability from
the city shall accompany the notice of increased valuation
from the assessor.
3. The notice of projected tax liability, required
under subsection 2 of this section, from the city shall
include:
(1) The record owner's name, address, and the parcel
number of the property;


(2) A list of all political subdivisions levying a tax
upon the property of the record owner;
(3) The projected tax rate for each political
subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the record
owner, and the purpose for each levy of such political
subdivisions;
(4) The previous year's tax rates for each individual
tax levy imposed by each political subdivision levying a tax
upon the property of the record owner;
(5) The tax rate ceiling for each levy imposed by each
political subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the
record owner;
(6) The contact information for each political
subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the record
owner;
(7) A statement identifying any projected tax rates
for political subdivisions levying a tax upon the property
of the record owner, which were not calculated and provided
by the political subdivision levying the tax; and
(8) The total projected property tax liability of the
taxpayer.
4. Assessors may provide assessment sheets, valuation
notices, and other official communications electronically
upon obtaining consent from the property owner. No property
owner shall be required to receive electronic notices, and
paper notice shall be provided upon request.
137.1050. 1. For the purposes of this section, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "Eligible credit amount", the difference between
an eligible taxpayer's real property tax liability on such
taxpayer's homestead for a given tax year, minus the real
property tax liability on such homestead in the eligible
taxpayer's initial credit year;


(2) "Eligible taxpayer", a Missouri resident who:
(a) Is sixty-two years of age or older;
(b) Is an owner of record of a homestead or has a
legal or equitable interest in such property as evidenced by
a written instrument; and
(c) Is liable for the payment of real property taxes
on such homestead;
(3) "Homestead", real property actually occupied by an
eligible taxpayer as the primary residence. An eligible
taxpayer shall not claim more than one primary residence;
(4) "Initial credit year":
(a) In the case of a taxpayer that meets all
requirements of subdivision (2) of this subsection prior to
the year in which a credit is authorized pursuant to
subsection 2 of this section, the year in which such credit
is authorized;
(b) For all other taxpayers, the year in which the
taxpayer meets all requirements of subdivision (2) of this
subsection.
If in any tax year subsequent to the eligible taxpayer's
initial credit year the eligible taxpayer's real property
tax liability is lower than such liability in the initial
credit year, such tax year shall be considered the eligible
taxpayer's initial credit year for all subsequent tax
years. This provision shall not apply if an eligible
taxpayer's real property tax liability is lower than such
liability in the taxpayer's initial credit year solely due
to a reduction in a property tax levy made pursuant to
section 321.554.
2. (1) Any county authorized to impose a property tax
may grant a property tax credit to eligible taxpayers


residing in such county in an amount equal to the taxpayer's
eligible credit amount, provided that:
(a) Such county adopts an ordinance authorizing such
credit; or
(b) a. A petition in support of a referendum on such
a credit is signed by at least five percent of the
registered voters of such county voting in the last
gubernatorial election and the petition is delivered to the
governing body of the county, which shall subsequently hold
a referendum on such credit.
b. The ballot of submission for the question submitted
to the voters pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subdivision
shall be in substantially the following form:
Shall the County of ______ exempt senior
citizens aged 62 and older from increases in
the property tax liability due on such senior
citizens' primary residence?
□ YES □ NO
If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the
qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the
proposal, then the credit shall be in effect.
(2) An ordinance adopted pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not preclude such
ordinance from being amended or superseded by a petition
subsequently adopted pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subdivision (1) of this subsection.
3. (1) A county granting credit pursuant to this
section shall apply such credit when calculating the
eligible taxpayer's property tax liability for the tax
year. The amount of the credit shall be noted on the
statement of tax due sent to the eligible taxpayer by the


county collector. The county governing body may adopt
reasonable procedures in order to carry out the purposes and
intent of this section, provided that the county shall not
adopt any procedure that limits the definition or scope of
eligible credit amount or eligible taxpayer as defined in
this section.
(2) If an eligible taxpayer makes new construction and
improvements to such eligible taxpayer's homestead, the real
property tax liability for the taxpayer's initial credit
year shall be increased to reflect the real property tax
liability attributable to such new construction and
improvements.
(3) If an eligible taxpayer's homestead is annexed
into a taxing jurisdiction to which such eligible taxpayer
did not owe real property tax in the eligible taxpayer's
initial credit year, then the real property tax liability
for the taxpayer's initial credit year shall be increased to
reflect the real property tax liability owed to the annexing
taxing jurisdiction.
4. For the purposes of calculating property tax levies
pursuant to section 137.073, the total amount of credits
authorized by a county pursuant to this section shall be
considered tax revenue, as such term is defined in section
137.073, actually received.
5. A county granting a tax credit pursuant to this
section shall notify each political subdivision within such
county of the total credit amount applicable to such
political subdivision by no later than November thirtieth of
each year.
6. For all tax years beginning on or after the
100 effective date of this section, an eligible taxpayer
101 applying for the tax credit authorized under the provisions
102 of this section shall not be required to reapply annually.


103 Upon initial qualification under the provisions of this
104 section and any additional provisions adopted by the county
105 governing body, the eligible taxpayer shall maintain such
106 eligibility without a requirement to reapply for
107 qualification each year. The tax credit shall continue to
108 be automatically applied to the eligible taxpayer's
109 homestead until the tax year in which the eligible taxpayer
110 relocates to another homestead or upon the death of the
111 eligible taxpayer, which shall be certified with a copy of
112 the death certificate or notification of the relocation
113 within ninety days of the date of either such event. If a
114 credit is granted in error due to the failure of the
115 taxpayer to notify the county collector of relocation or
116 death, the governing body of the county may remedy the error.
137.1060. Beginning January 1, 2027, as part of the
report required by section 162.821, each district secretary
shall include in such report the total amount of property
tax credits authorized by sections 137.1050 and 137.1055
that are applicable to the district for the prior year, as
provided to the school district by the county pursuant to
subsection 5 of section 137.1050 and subsection 5 of section
137.1055.
139.031. 1. (1) Any taxpayer may protest all or any
part of any current taxes assessed against the taxpayer,
except taxes collected by the director of revenue of
Missouri. Any such taxpayer desiring to pay any current
taxes under protest or while paying taxes based upon a
disputed assessment shall, at the time of paying such taxes,
make full payment of the current tax bill before the
delinquency date and file with the collector a written
statement setting forth the grounds on which the protest is
based. The statement shall include the true value in money
claimed by the taxpayer if disputed. An appeal before the


state tax commission shall not be dismissed on the grounds
that a taxpayer failed to file a written statement when
paying taxes based upon a disputed assessment.
(2) (a) The governing body of any county may by
ordinance or order provide for partial payments on
residential real property taxes assessed and in dispute,
when a taxpayer has appealed an assessment on their primary
residence that has not been resolved by the property tax
payment deadline, at the option of the taxpayer.
(b) The county may enter into an agreement with a
taxpayer that requires the taxpayer to make a minimum
payment that is greater than or equal to the tax liability
assessed on the residential real property in the previous
year and to pay the remainder due, if any, after all appeals
and final judgment has been entered, with interest on the
remaining disputed amount deferred at a rate not to exceed
the lesser of five percent or the annual percentage increase
in inflation based on the Consumer Price Index for All Urban
Consumers in the Midwest Region, as recorded by the United
States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, or
its successor index, and in addition, shall pay to the
county the ten dollar fee established under subsection 3 of
section 140.100. Upon minimum payment, per the agreement,
the taxpayer's account shall be considered in compliance
until the appeal is resolved and the taxpayer has been given
notice of any final payment amount and thirty days to make
full payment.
(c) If a taxpayer fails to make the initial approved
partial payment of the residential real property taxes owed
to the county on or before the due date as determined by the
agreement, such county shall charge the taxpayer interest
and penalties on the amount of property taxes still owed for
that year, which shall include the late partial payment


amount and the deferred payment amount. No county shall
charge a taxpayer interest or penalties on any amount of
property taxes the taxpayer has already paid. Delinquent
residential real property taxes under this subdivision shall
bear interest at the rate provided by section 140.100.
2. Upon receiving payment of current taxes under
protest under subsection 1 of this section or upon receiving
from the state tax commission or the circuit court notice of
an appeal from the state tax commission or the circuit court
under section 138.430, along with full payment of the
current tax bill before the delinquency date, the collector
shall disburse to the proper official all portions of taxes
not protested or not disputed by the taxpayer and shall
impound in a separate fund all portions of such taxes which
are protested or in dispute. Every taxpayer protesting the
payment of current taxes under subsection 1 of this section
shall, within ninety days after filing his protest, commence
an action against the collector by filing a petition for the
recovery of the amount protested in the circuit court of the
county in which the collector maintains his office. If any
taxpayer so protesting his taxes under subsection 1 of this
section shall fail to commence an action in the circuit
court for the recovery of the taxes protested within the
time prescribed in this subsection, such protest shall
become null and void and of no effect, and the collector
shall then disburse to the proper official the taxes
impounded, and any interest earned thereon, as provided
above in this subsection.
3. No action against the collector shall be commenced
by any taxpayer who has, effective for the current tax year,
filed with the state tax commission or the circuit court a
timely and proper appeal of the assessment of the taxpayer's
property. The portion of taxes in dispute from an appeal of


an assessment shall be impounded in a separate fund and the
commission in its decision and order issued under chapter
138 or the circuit court in its judgment may order all or
any part of such taxes refunded to the taxpayer, or may
authorize the collector to release and disburse all or any
part of such taxes.
4. Trial of the action for recovery of taxes protested
under subsection 1 of this section in the circuit court
shall be in the manner prescribed for nonjury civil
proceedings, and, after determination of the issues, the
court shall make such orders as may be just and equitable to
refund to the taxpayer all or any part of the current taxes
paid under protest, together with any interest earned
thereon, or to authorize the collector to release and
disburse all or any part of the impounded taxes, and any
interest earned thereon, to the appropriate officials of the
taxing authorities. Either party to the proceedings may
appeal the determination of the circuit court.
5. All the county collectors of taxes, and the
collector of taxes in any city not within a county, shall,
upon written application of a taxpayer, refund or credit
against the taxpayer's tax liability in the following
100 [taxable] tax year and subsequent consecutive [taxable] tax
101 years until the taxpayer has received credit in full for any
102 real or personal property tax mistakenly or erroneously
103 levied against the taxpayer and collected in whole or in
104 part by the collector. Such application shall be filed
105 within three years after the tax is mistakenly or
106 erroneously paid. The governing body, or other appropriate
107 body or official of the county or city not within a county,
108 shall make available to the collector funds necessary to
109 make refunds under this subsection by issuing warrants upon


110 the fund to which the mistaken or erroneous payment has been
111 credited, or otherwise.
112 6. No taxpayer shall receive any interest on any money
113 paid in by the taxpayer erroneously.
114 7. All protested taxes impounded under protest under
115 subsection 1 of this section and all disputed taxes
116 impounded under notice as required by section 138.430 shall
117 be invested by the collector in the same manner as assets
118 specified in section 30.260 for investment of state moneys.
119 A taxpayer who is entitled to a refund of protested or
120 disputed taxes shall also receive the interest earned on the
121 investment thereof. If the collector is ordered to release
122 and disburse all or part of the taxes paid under protest or
123 dispute to the proper official, such taxes shall be
124 disbursed along with the proportional amount of interest
125 earned on the investment of the taxes due the particular
126 taxing authority.
127 8. Any taxing authority may request to be notified by
128 the county collector of current taxes paid under protest.
129 Such request shall be in writing and submitted on or before
130 February first next following the delinquent date of current
131 taxes paid under protest or disputed, and the county
132 collector shall provide such information on or before March
133 first of the same year to the requesting taxing authority of
134 the taxes paid under protest and disputed taxes which would
135 be received by such taxing authority if the funds were not
136 the subject of a protest or dispute. Any taxing authority
137 may apply to the circuit court of the county or city not
138 within a county in which a collector has impounded protested
139 or disputed taxes under this section and, upon a
140 satisfactory showing that such taxing authority would
141 receive such impounded tax funds if they were not the
142 subject of a protest or dispute and that such taxing


143 authority has the financial ability and legal capacity to
144 repay such impounded tax funds in the event a decision
145 ordering a refund to the taxpayer is subsequently made, the
146 circuit court shall order, pendente lite, the disbursal of
147 all or any part of such impounded tax funds to such taxing
148 authority. The circuit court issuing an order under this
149 subsection shall retain jurisdiction of such matter for
150 further proceedings, if any, to compel restitution of such
151 tax funds to the taxpayer. In the event that any protested
152 or disputed tax funds refunded to a taxpayer were disbursed
153 to a taxing authority under this subsection instead of being
154 held and invested by the collector under subsection 7 of
155 this section, the taxpayer shall be entitled to interest on
156 all refunded tax funds at the annual rate calculated by the
157 state treasurer and applied by the director of revenue under
158 section 32.068. This measure of interest shall only apply
159 to protested or disputed tax funds actually distributed to a
160 taxing authority pursuant to this subsection. In the event
161 of a refund of protested or disputed tax funds which remain
162 impounded by the collector, the taxpayer shall instead be
163 entitled to the interest actually earned on those refunded
164 impounded tax funds under subsection 7 of this section. Any
165 sovereign or official immunity otherwise applicable to the
166 taxing authorities is hereby waived for all purposes related
167 to this subsection, and the taxpayer is expressly authorized
168 to seek an order enforcing this provision from the circuit
169 court that originally ordered the distribution of the
170 protested or disputed funds, or directly from the state tax
171 commission, if the tax appeal that resulted in the refund
172 was heard and determined by the state tax commission.
173 9. No appeal filed from the circuit court's or state
174 tax commission's determination pertaining to the amount of
175 refund shall stay any order of refund, but the decision


176 filed by any court of last review modifying that
177 determination shall be binding on the parties, and the
178 decision rendered shall be complied with by the party
179 affected by any modification within ninety days of the date
180 of such decision. No taxpayer shall receive any interest on
181 any additional award of refund, and the collector shall not
182 receive any interest on any ordered return of refund in
183 whole or in part.
139.053. 1. The governing body of any county[,
excluding township counties,] may by ordinance or order
provide for the payment of all or any part of current real
and personal property taxes which are owed, at the option of
the taxpayer, on an annual, semiannual [or], quarterly,
monthly, or weekly basis at such times as determined by such
governing body.
2. The ordinance shall provide the method by which the
amount of property taxes owed for the current tax year in
which the payments are to be made shall be estimated. The
collector shall submit to the governing body the procedures
by which taxes will be collected pursuant to the ordinance
or order. The estimate shall be based on the previous tax
year's liability. A taxpayer's payment schedule shall be
based on the estimate divided by the number of pay periods
in which payments are to be made. The taxpayer shall at the
end of the tax year pay any amounts owed in excess of the
estimate for such year. The county shall at the end of the
tax year refund to the taxpayer any amounts paid in excess
of the property tax owed for such year. No interest shall
be paid by the county on excess amounts owed to the
taxpayer. Any refund paid the taxpayer pursuant to this
subsection shall be an amount paid by the county only once
in a calendar year.


3. If a taxpayer fails to make an installment payment
of a portion of the real or personal property taxes owed to
the county, then such county may charge the taxpayer
interest on the amount of property taxes still owed for that
year.
4. Any governing body enacting the ordinance or order
specified in this section shall first agree to provide the
county collector with reasonable and necessary funds to
implement the ordinance or order.
5. Subsection 1 of this section shall not apply to
payment for real property taxes by financial institutions,
as defined in section 381.410, who pay tax obligations which
they service from escrow accounts, as defined in Title 24,
Part 3500, Section 17, Code of Federal Regulation, as
amended.
139.145. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the county assessor, township assessor, or other
county designee responsible for the administration of
assessment lists, personal property declarations, homestead
verification forms, or other assessment-related filings may
allow a grace period not to exceed ten days following the
statutory deadline for submission of such forms when such
forms are transmitted through the United States Postal
Service and postmarked on or before the applicable due date
but received after such due date due to postal delay. Any
such form received within the authorized grace period shall
be deemed timely filed and shall not result in penalty,
estimated assessment, or disqualification from any property
tax credit or relief program solely due to delayed receipt.
The assessor or county designee may establish reasonable
procedures to verify postmark dates and ensure uniform and
consistent application of such grace period in accordance
with state law.


140.010. 1. All real estate upon which the taxes
remain unpaid on the first day of January, annually, are
delinquent, and the county collector shall enforce the lien
of the state thereon, as required by this chapter. Any
failure to properly return the delinquent list, as required
by this chapter, in no way affects the validity of the
assessment and levy of taxes, nor of the foreclosure and
sale by which the collection of the taxes is enforced, nor
in any manner affects the lien of the state on the
delinquent real estate for the taxes unpaid thereon.
2. Alternatively, any county may, by adoption of a
resolution or order of the county commission of such county,
elect to operate under the provisions of sections 141.210 to
141.810 for any parcel for which there is an unpaid tax bill
for a period of at least two years after the date on which
it became delinquent. Any county electing to operate as
such shall be called a "partial opt-in county". No county
eligible to establish a land bank agency under subsection 1
of section 140.981 shall elect to operate as a partial opt-
in county unless the county first elects to establish a land
bank agency as provided in subsection 1 of section 140.981.
In accordance with section 141.290, after the adoption of
such resolution or order by a county commission, the
collector of the county shall decide which tax delinquent
parcels shall proceed according to the provisions of
sections 141.210 to 141.810. Such parcels shall be exempt
from the provisions of sections 140.030 to 140.722. The
collector shall remove such parcels from any list of parcels
advertised for first, second, third, or post-third sales.
3. (1) As used in this subsection, the following
terms shall mean:
(a) "Taxpayer", an owner of record of property on
which property tax is due;


(b) "Trusted contact", an adult person designated by a
taxpayer that a collector may contact in the event the
taxpayer has a delinquent property tax liability as of the
first day of March.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, a county collector may offer a trusted contact
program to taxpayers who may designate one or more trusted
contacts for the collector to contact in the event the
taxpayer has not paid the taxpayer's property tax liability
by the first day of March. The collector may establish such
procedures, requirements, and forms as the collector deems
appropriate and necessary should the collector decide to
implement a trusted contact program.
164.151. 1. The questions on bond issues in all
districts shall be submitted in substantially the following
form:
Shall the ______ board of education borrow
money in the amount of ______ dollars for the
purpose of ______ and issue bonds for the
payment thereof resulting in an estimated
increase to the debt service property tax levy
of ______ (amount of estimated increase) per one
hundred dollars of assessed valuation? If this
proposition is approved, the adjusted debt
service levy of the school district is estimated
to increase from ______ (amount of current
school district levy) to ______ (estimated
adjusted debt service levy) per one hundred
dollars assessed valuation of real and personal
property, and it is estimated that the bonded
indebtedness of the school district would be
extended ______ years.


2. If the constitutionally required number of the
votes cast are for the loan, the board may, subject to the
restrictions of section 164.161, borrow money in the name of
the district, to the amount and for the purpose specified in
the notices aforesaid, and issue bonds of the district for
the payment thereof.
Section 1. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Missouri Taxpayer Debt Relief and School
Facilities Act". It is the intent of the general assembly
through the Missouri taxpayer debt relief and school
facilities act to:
(1) Provide state support for public school facility
projects that are currently funded by local property
taxpayers; and
(2) Reduce the property tax burden on Missouri
taxpayers by lowering the amount of bonded indebtedness and
property tax levies of school districts that need to finance
necessary capital improvements in academic facilities.
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Academic facility", a building or space, and
related portions of the physical plant and grounds, where
public school students receive instruction that is an
integral part of an adequate public education program,
including classrooms, libraries, laboratories, and related
support spaces, but excluding:
(a) Central or district administration buildings;
(b) Noninstructional warehouses, bus barns, and
maintenance facilities;
(c) Athletic stadiums and similar competition venues,
except to the extent a portion of such facilities is
regularly scheduled instructional space; and
(d) Facilities leased from or by the district, unless
otherwise provided by rule of the commission;


(2) "Commission", the Missouri commission on academic
facilities established in this section;
(3) "Facility condition index", a ratio that compares
the cost of repairing or renovating an academic facility to
the cost of replacing such facility, as determined by the
commission by rule;
(4) "Fiscal capacity", the relative ability of a
school district to raise local resources for capital
projects, as determined by the commission, which may include
consideration of a district's property tax base, income
levels, existing debt service, and other factors the
commission deems appropriate;
(5) "Immediate repair project", an academic facilities
project that addresses an existing condition that presents a
substantial and imminent danger to the health or safety of
occupants, a serious deficiency in structural integrity or
major building systems, or an urgent need to comply with
applicable building, fire, or accessibility code
requirements;
(6) "Local resources", the portion of the cost of a
project to be funded from revenues of the school district,
including proceeds of bonds, capital levies, or other
locally controlled funds, but excluding any moneys received
from the Missouri academic facilities partnership fund;
(7) "Maintenance, repair, and renovation", any
activity, improvement, or work on an academic facility that
maintains, conserves, or restores the condition or
efficiency of the facility, including, but not limited to,
roof repair or replacement, HVAC, electrical, plumbing,
interior finishes, accessibility improvements, and code
compliance upgrades;
(8) "New construction", any improvement that brings an
academic facility to a better condition or efficiency,


including construction of a new building, additions to an
existing building, or major alterations that significantly
change capacity or function;
(9) "Operating levy for school purposes", as such term
is defined in section 163.011 or any successor provision;
(10) "Performance levy", as such term is defined in
section 163.011 or any successor provision;
(11) "Project", an undertaking by a school district
involving maintenance, repair, and renovation, new
construction, or any combination thereof, with respect to
one or more academic facilities;
(12) "School district" or "district", any public
school district organized under the laws of this state.
3. There is hereby created the "Missouri Commission on
Academic Facilities". The commission shall be housed within
the department of elementary and secondary education for
administrative purposes, and such department shall provide
staff and administrative support to the commission.
Appointed members of the commission shall serve six-year
terms, and all members of the commission shall serve without
compensation but may be reimbursed for necessary expenses
incurred in the performance of their duties. The commission
shall consist of the following seven members, who shall have
demonstrated experience in public school administration,
school facility planning or construction, or public finance:
(1) The commissioner of education or the
commissioner's designee;
(2) Two members appointed by the governor, not more
than one from the same political party;
(3) One member appointed by the president pro tempore
of the Missouri senate;
(4) One member appointed by the senate minority
leader; and


(5) Two members appointed by the speaker of the house
of representatives, not more than one from the same
political party.
4. The commission shall:
(1) Administer the Missouri academic facilities
partnership fund and implement this section;
100 (2) Adopt rules to implement this section, including
101 rules establishing:
102 (a) Application procedures and timelines;
103 (b) Project evaluation criteria and scoring systems;
104 (c) Project categories and definitions that, at a
105 minimum, distinguish projects that address health, safety,
106 and code compliance needs; major maintenance, repair,
107 renovation, and replacement projects; and new construction,
108 additions, and space or capacity projects;
109 (d) Facility standards and a facility condition index
110 methodology;
111 (e) Reporting, monitoring, and audit requirements; and
112 (f) A methodology for state and local cost sharing
113 based on district fiscal capacity;
114 (3) Review and approve or disapprove school district
115 applications for state financial participation in academic
116 facilities projects;
117 (4) Determine, for each approved project, the state
118 share and local share of eligible project costs in
119 accordance with the cost sharing methodology established
120 under this section;
121 (5) Apply the priorities and factors set forth in this
122 section and annually adopt a statewide prioritized list of
123 projects recommended for funding; and
124 (6) Monitor the use of state funds and project
125 completion and require such reports and audits from school


126 districts as are necessary to ensure compliance with this
127 section and rules adopted under it.
128 5. Except as expressly provided in this section, all
129 procedures, standards, criteria, and scoring systems
130 governing applications for and awards of state financial
131 participation shall be determined by the commission by rule
132 and may be modified over time as the commission deems
133 necessary to prudently and resourcefully expend state funds.
134 6. The commission shall establish, by rule, a
135 methodology for determining the relative fiscal capacity of
136 each school district to provide local resources for academic
137 facilities projects and the respective state and local
138 shares of eligible project costs for districts that receive
139 state financial participation. In developing this
140 methodology, the commission shall consider measures of
141 district fiscal capacity that may include, but need not be
142 limited to, assessed valuation, property wealth per pupil,
143 income levels, the district's operating levy, existing debt
144 service obligations, and other indicators of the ability to
145 raise local capital. The commission shall ensure that
146 districts with lower fiscal capacity and higher operating
147 levies generally qualify for higher effective state support
148 than districts with higher fiscal capacity and lower
149 operating levies. The commission shall, by rule, establish
150 minimum and maximum state participation percentages for
151 eligible project costs and may differentiate such
152 percentages among project categories described in this
153 section.
154 7. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury
155 the "Missouri School Facilities Partnership Fund", which
156 shall consist of moneys appropriated by the general assembly
157 and any other moneys authorized by law to be deposited in
158 the fund. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the


159 fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the
160 state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall
161 be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, moneys in this
162 fund shall be used solely to provide state financial
163 participation in eligible academic facilities projects for
164 school districts under this section and to pay the
165 reasonable administrative costs of the department of
166 elementary and secondary education and the commission
167 established in this section.
168 (2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080
169 to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end
170 of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
171 general revenue fund.
172 (3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the
173 fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any
174 interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
175 credited to the fund.
176 8. Notwithstanding any provision of this section to
177 the contrary, a school district may apply to the commission
178 for state financial participation in an academic facilities
179 project only if:
180 (1) The district has adopted and submitted to the
181 commission a long range facilities plan in a form approved
182 by the commission;
183 (2) The proposed project is consistent with that plan
184 and with applicable facility standards established by the
185 commission; and
186 (3) The district's current operating levy for school
187 purposes is at or above the performance levy, or the
188 district's operating levy for school purposes was at or
189 above the performance levy at any point during the preceding
190 four fiscal years but was reduced below such levy amount due
191 to a constitutionally mandated rollback.


192 9. In each funding cycle, the commission shall award
193 state financial participation in accordance with the
194 following priorities:
195 (1) First order priority shall be given to projects
196 that address substantial and imminent dangers to health or
197 safety, serious deficiencies in structural integrity or
198 major building systems, or urgent compliance with building,
199 fire, or accessibility codes in academic facilities,
200 including immediate repair projects;
201 (2) Second order priority shall be given to projects
202 that create substantial and demonstrable efficiencies in the
203 ongoing costs of operation of a school district, including,
204 but not limited to, projects that reduce utility or
205 maintenance costs, improve energy efficiency, or modernize
206 facilities in connection with voluntary consolidation,
207 annexation, or cooperative reorganization of districts or
208 attendance centers;
209 (3) Third order priority shall be given to projects
210 that remedy significant facility condition deficiencies,
211 extend the useful life of academic facilities, or replace
212 facilities whose facility condition index exceeds a
213 threshold established by the commission; and
214 (4) Fourth order priority shall be given to projects
215 that provide additional capacity or reconfigured space
216 necessary to accommodate enrollment growth, eliminate
217 excessive reliance on temporary classrooms, or support
218 educationally required programmatic changes.
219 10. Within and among the priority categories
220 established in subsection 9 of this section, the commission
221 shall further prioritize projects by considering at least
222 the following factors, in such manner and relative weight as
223 the commission shall establish by rule:


224 (1) The severity of the facility need and the
225 educational impact of the project, including facility
226 condition, educational adequacy, and enrollment pressures;
227 (2) The school district's fiscal capacity, so that
228 districts with lower fiscal capacity receive higher
229 effective state support;
230 (3) The school district's operating levy, so that
231 districts with higher levies receive higher effective state
232 support to lower or mitigate increases in the amount of
233 property taxes residents must pay than districts with lower
234 operating levies;
235 (4) The extent to which the district is already
236 relying on local funding effort, prioritizing districts that
237 receive less than half of their total revenue from state
238 sources, including:
239 (a) Existing debt service millage or equivalent local
240 levy for capital purposes; and
241 (b) The proportion of total operating and capital
242 revenues derived from local sources;
243 (5) The availability or lack of additional local
244 bonding capacity for facilities purposes, including
245 districts that are at, or within a threshold established by
246 the commission of, the maximum bonded indebtedness level
247 permitted by law or commission policy, or that can otherwise
248 demonstrate insufficient remaining bonding capacity to
249 address critical facility needs without state participation;
250 (6) The degree of local matching commitment associated
251 with the project, including:
252 (a) Local cash or in-kind contributions, including
253 proceeds of bonds or levies, dedicated deposits to a capital
254 and maintenance reserve fund, or other local capital
255 sources; and


256 (b) Local actions that provide property tax relief to
257 district residents in connection with the project, such as:
258 a. Reducing existing or planned debt service levies
259 due to state participation; or
260 b. Avoiding or reducing the need for new or higher
261 debt service levies that would otherwise be required to
262 complete the project; and
263 (7) The prudent and resourceful expenditure of state
264 funds, including consideration of life cycle cost, energy
265 efficiency, and the extent to which state dollars leverage
266 or replace local borrowing in a manner that reduces long
267 term tax burdens while addressing facility needs.
268 11. The commission shall publish, at least annually,
269 the statewide prioritized list of projects recommended for
270 funding and shall identify, for each project, the category
271 and principal factors supporting the commission's
272 recommended priority.
273 12. No project shall receive state financial
274 participation under this section unless the district
275 demonstrates a good faith local matching commitment, as
276 determined by the commission.
277 13. In awarding state financial participation, the
278 commission shall give favorable consideration to projects
279 that are accompanied by a plan, approved by the district's
280 governing board, that uses state participation to offset or
281 reduce the amount of new local debt that would otherwise be
282 required for the project or allows for a reduction in future
283 debt service levies or avoidance of levy increases that
284 would otherwise be needed.
285 14. The commission shall not require a district
286 eligible to apply for state financial participation under
287 subsection 8 of this section to increase local tax rates as
288 a condition of receiving state financial participation. The


289 commission shall ensure that state funds are allocated in a
290 manner that reasonably balances:
291 (1) Preference for districts demonstrating strong
292 local effort;
293 (2) Consideration for districts with limited remaining
294 bonding capacity; and
295 (3) The goal of mitigating, where practicable, the
296 long term property tax burden associated with necessary
297 facility improvements.
298 15. A district receiving state financial participation
299 shall comply with all applicable procurement, construction,
300 and reporting requirements and shall complete the project
301 substantially as described in such district's approved
302 application, unless otherwise authorized by the commission.
303 16. The commission may withhold, suspend, or require
304 repayment of state funds if the commission finds that a
305 district has materially violated the requirements of this
306 section, rules promulgated under this section, or the terms
307 of such district's approved project.
308 17. The commission shall promulgate rules to implement
309 the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a
310 rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
311 created under the authority delegated in this section shall
312 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
313 all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
314 section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
315 nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
316 general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
317 the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
318 subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
319 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
320 August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.


Section B. In the event that any section, provision,
clause, phrase, or word of this act or the application
thereof is declared invalid under the Constitution of the
United States or the Constitution of the State of Missouri,
whether on procedural or substantive grounds, it is the
intent of the general assembly that the remaining sections
of this act remain in force and effect as far as they are
capable of being carried into execution as intended by the
general assembly. The general assembly hereby declares that
it would have passed each section, provision, clause,
phrase, or word thereof, irrespective of the fact that any
one or more sections, provisions, clauses, phrases, or words
of this act or the application of this act would be declared
unenforceable, unconstitutional, or invalid.